New Jersey, session 221, S1598.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 4 of P.L.1991, c.290 (C.9:6B-4) is amended to read as follows: 4.    A child placed outside his home shall have the following rights, consistent with the health, safety and physical and psychological welfare of the child and as appropriate to the individual circumstances of the child's physical or mental development: a.     To placement outside his home only after the applicable department has made every reasonable effort, including the provision or arrangement of financial or other assistance and services as necessary, to enable the child to remain in his home; b.    To the best efforts of the applicable department, including the provision or arrangement of financial or other assistance and services as necessary, to place the child with a relative; c.     To the best efforts of the applicable department, including the provision or arrangement of financial or other assistance and services as necessary, to place the child in an appropriate setting in his own community; d.    To the best efforts of the applicable department to place the child in the same setting with the child's sibling if the sibling is also being placed outside his home; e.     To visit with the child's parents or legal guardian immediately after the child has been placed outside his home and on a regular basis thereafter, and to otherwise maintain contact with the child's parents or legal guardian, and to receive assistance from the applicable department to facilitate that contact, including the provision or arrangement of transportation as necessary; f.     To visit with the child's sibling on a regular basis and to otherwise maintain contact with the child's sibling if the child was separated from his sibling upon placement outside his home, including the provision or arrangement of transportation as necessary; g.    To placement in the least restrictive setting appropriate to the child's needs and conducive to the health and safety of the child; h.    To be free from physical or psychological abuse and from repeated changes in placement before the permanent placement or return home of the child; i.     To have regular contact with any caseworker assigned to the child's case who is employed by the applicable department or any agency or organization with which the applicable department contracts to provide services and the opportunity, as appropriate to the age of the child, to participate in the planning and regular review of the child's case, and to be informed on a timely basis of changes in any placement plan which is prepared pursuant to law or regulation and the reasons therefor in terms and language appropriate to the child's ability to understand; j.     To have a placement plan, as required by law or regulation, that reflects the child's best interests and is designed to facilitate the permanent placement or return home of the child in a timely manner that is appropriate to the needs of the child; k.    To services of a high quality that are designed to maintain and advance the child's mental and physical well-being; l.     To be represented in the planning and regular review of the child's case, including the placement and development of, or revisions to, any placement plan which is required by law or regulation and the provision of services to the child, the child's parents or legal guardian and the temporary caretaker, by a person other than the child's parent or legal guardian or temporary caretaker who will advocate for the best interests of the child and the enforcement of the rights established pursuant to this act, which person may be the caseworker, as appropriate, or a person appointed by the court for this purpose; m.   To receive an educational program which will maximize the child's potential; n.    To receive adequate, safe and appropriate food, clothing and housing; o.    To receive adequate and appropriate medical care; [and] p.    To be free from unwarranted physical restraint and isolation; and q.    To have conspicuous signage displayed in no less than three locations in the home that lists contact information for children who are abused or who require mental health services. (cf: P.L.1991, c.290, s.4) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.